Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.240

Student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund—State treasurer.

The student achievement council tuition recovery trust fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from fees imposed on schools licensed under this chapter and RCW 28B.85.230 must be deposited into the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only for the purposes in RCW 28B.85.230. Only the council may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2018 c 203 s 12.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2018 c 203: See note following RCW 28B.85.095.